src/verb-tgl-morph.txt
LEXICON Prefixes

@P.ACT1.ON@:%^UM%>@P.ACT1.ON@ VRoots;
@P.ACT3.ON@:man%>@P.ACT3.ON@  VRoots ;
RE+                         VRoots ;

LEXICON VConjReg

@P.ACT3.ON@+V+Inf+Act3: # ;
@P.ACT1.ON@+V+Inf+Act1: # ;
+V+Inf:@P.ACT3.OFF@              #;  ! Infinitive
+V+Inf:@P.ACT1.OFF@              #;  ! Infinitive
+V+Inf+Obj1:%>in     #;  ! Infinitive, Object focus #1
+V+Inf+Obj3:%>an     #;  ! Infinitive, Object focus #2
+V+Inf+Loc:%>an      #;  ! Infinitive, Locative focus
 
+V+Imp+Obj1:@P.ACT3.OFF@         #;  ! Imperative, Object focus #1
+V+Imp+Obj1:@P.ACT1.OFF@         #;  ! Imperative, Object focus #1
+V+Imp+Obj1:%>a      #;  ! Imperative, Object focus #1
+V+Imp+Obj2:%>an     #;  ! Imperative, Object focus #2
+V+Imp+Obj3:%>i      #;  ! Imperative, Object focus #3
